Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803.05
Assisted-living facility, defined.

Assisted-living facility has the same meaning as in section 71-406.

Laws 1989, LB 429, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 608, § 18;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 71-5809.01;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 9;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 114.